hunspell/mhr/mari.aff
FLAG long
SFX F7 е ыландажак е
SFX F7 е ыландажат е
SFX F7 е ыландажыс е
SFX F7 о ыланда/S4 о
SFX F7 о ыландаже о
SFX F7 о ыландажак о
SFX F7 о ыландажат о
SFX F7 о ыландажыс о
SFX F7 ӧ ыланда/S4 ӧ
SFX F7 ӧ ыландаже ӧ
SFX F7 ӧ ыландажак ӧ
SFX F7 ӧ ыландажат ӧ
SFX F7 ӧ ыландажыс ӧ
SFX F7 0 дажлан/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыдажлан/S2 а
SFX F7 е ыдажлан/S2 е
SFX F7 о ыдажлан/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыдажлан/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 дам/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыдам/S2 а
SFX F7 е ыдам/S2 е
SFX F7 о ыдам/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыдам/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 дажым/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыдажым/S2 а
SFX F7 е ыдажым/S2 е
SFX F7 о ыдажым/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыдажым/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 дала/S4 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыдала/S4 а
SFX F7 е ыдала/S4 е
SFX F7 о ыдала/S4 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыдала/S4 ӧ
SFX F7 0 дажла/S4 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыдажла/S4 а
SFX F7 е ыдажла/S4 е
SFX F7 о ыдажла/S4 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыдажла/S4 ӧ
SFX F7 0 даге/S5 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыдаге/S5 а
SFX F7 е ыдаге/S5 е
SFX F7 о ыдаге/S5 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыдаге/S5 ӧ
SFX F7 0 дажге/S5 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыдажге/S5 а
SFX F7 е ыдажге/S5 е
SFX F7 о ыдажге/S5 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыдажге/S5 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштыда/S4 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштыда/S4 а
SFX F7 е ыштыда/S4 е
SFX F7 о ыштыда/S4 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштыда/S4 ӧ
SFX F7 0 тыда [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ыштыдаже [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштыдаже а
SFX F7 е ыштыдаже е
SFX F7 о ыштыдаже о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштыдаже ӧ
SFX F7 0 тыдаже [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ыштыдажак [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштыдажак а
SFX F7 е ыштыдажак е
SFX F7 о ыштыдажак о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштыдажак ӧ
SFX F7 0 тыдажак [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ыштыдажат [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштыдажат а
SFX F7 е ыштыдажат е
SFX F7 о ыштыдажат о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштыдажат ӧ
SFX F7 0 тыдажат [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ыштыдажыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштыдажыс а
SFX F7 е ыштыдажыс е
SFX F7 о ыштыдажыс о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштыдажыс ӧ
SFX F7 0 тыдажыс [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ышкыда/S4 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышкыда/S4 а
SFX F7 е ышкыда/S4 е
SFX F7 о ышкыда/S4 о
SFX F7 ӧ ышкыда/S4 ӧ
SFX F7 0 кыда [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ышкыдаже [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышкыдаже а
SFX F7 е ышкыдаже е
SFX F7 о ышкыдаже о
SFX F7 ӧ ышкыдаже ӧ
SFX F7 0 кыдаже [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ышкыдажак [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышкыдажак а
SFX F7 е ышкыдажак е
SFX F7 о ышкыдажак о
SFX F7 ӧ ышкыдажак ӧ
SFX F7 0 кыдажак [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ышкыдажат [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышкыдажат а
SFX F7 е ышкыдажат е
SFX F7 о ышкыдажат о
SFX F7 ӧ ышкыдажат ӧ
SFX F7 0 кыдажат [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ышкыдажыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышкыдажыс а
SFX F7 е ышкыдажыс е
SFX F7 о ышкыдажыс о
SFX F7 ӧ ышкыдажыс ӧ
SFX F7 0 кыдажыс [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ешда/S4 [^аеоӧйь]
SFX F7 а ешда/S4 а
SFX F7 е ешда/S4 е
SFX F7 о ешда/S4 о
SFX F7 ӧ ешда/S4 ӧ
SFX F7 й ешда/S4 й
SFX F7 ь ешда/S4 ь
SFX F7 0 ешдаже [^аеоӧйь]
SFX F7 а ешдаже а
SFX F7 е ешдаже е
SFX F7 о ешдаже о
SFX F7 ӧ ешдаже ӧ
SFX F7 й ешдаже й
SFX F7 ь ешдаже ь
SFX F7 0 ешдажак [^аеоӧйь]
SFX F7 а ешдажак а
SFX F7 е ешдажак е
SFX F7 о ешдажак о
SFX F7 ӧ ешдажак ӧ
SFX F7 й ешдажак й
SFX F7 ь ешдажак ь
SFX F7 0 ешдажат [^аеоӧйь]
SFX F7 а ешдажат а
SFX F7 е ешдажат е
SFX F7 о ешдажат о
SFX F7 ӧ ешдажат ӧ
SFX F7 й ешдажат й
SFX F7 ь ешдажат ь
SFX F7 0 ешдажыс [^аеоӧйь]
SFX F7 а ешдажыс а
SFX F7 е ешдажыс е
SFX F7 о ешдажыс о
SFX F7 ӧ ешдажыс ӧ
SFX F7 й ешдажыс й
SFX F7 ь ешдажыс ь
SFX F7 0 даде/S5 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыдаде/S5 а
SFX F7 е ыдаде/S5 е
SFX F7 о ыдаде/S5 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыдаде/S5 ӧ
SFX F7 0 дажде/S5 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыдажде/S5 а
SFX F7 е ыдажде/S5 е
SFX F7 о ыдажде/S5 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыдажде/S5 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ышт/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышт/S2 а
SFX F7 е ышт/S2 е
SFX F7 о ышт/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ышт/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ышт/O1 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышт/O1 а
SFX F7 е ышт/O1 е
SFX F7 о ышт/O1 о
SFX F7 ӧ ышт/O1 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштшӧ/O1 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштшӧ/O1 а
SFX F7 е ыштшӧ/O1 е
SFX F7 о ыштшӧ/O1 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштшӧ/O1 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштшак/O1 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштшак/O1 а
SFX F7 е ыштшак/O1 е
SFX F7 о ыштшак/O1 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштшак/O1 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштшат/O1 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштшат/O1 а
SFX F7 е ыштшат/O1 е
SFX F7 о ыштшат/O1 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштшат/O1 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштшыс/O1 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштшыс/O1 а
SFX F7 е ыштшыс/O1 е
SFX F7 о ыштшыс/O1 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштшыс/O1 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштын/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштын/S2 а
SFX F7 е ыштын/S2 е
SFX F7 о ыштын/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштын/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштшын/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштшын/S2 а
SFX F7 е ыштшын/S2 е
SFX F7 о ыштшын/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштшын/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштлан/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштлан/S2 а
SFX F7 е ыштлан/S2 е
SFX F7 о ыштлан/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштлан/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ланышт/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 0 ланыштше [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 0 ланыштшак [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 0 ланыштшат [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 0 ланыштшыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыланышт/S2 а
SFX F7 а ыланыштше а
SFX F7 а ыланыштшак а
SFX F7 а ыланыштшат а
SFX F7 а ыланыштшыс а
SFX F7 е ыланышт/S2 е
SFX F7 е ыланыштше е
SFX F7 е ыланыштшак е
SFX F7 е ыланыштшат е
SFX F7 е ыланыштшыс е
SFX F7 о ыланышт/S2 о
SFX F7 о ыланыштше о
SFX F7 о ыланыштшак о
SFX F7 о ыланыштшат о
SFX F7 о ыланыштшыс о
SFX F7 ӧ ыланышт/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 ӧ ыланыштше ӧ
SFX F7 ӧ ыланыштшак ӧ
SFX F7 ӧ ыланыштшат ӧ
SFX F7 ӧ ыланыштшыс ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштшылан/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштшылан/S2 а
SFX F7 е ыштшылан/S2 е
SFX F7 о ыштшылан/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштшылан/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштым/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштым/S2 а
SFX F7 е ыштым/S2 е
SFX F7 о ыштым/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштым/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштшым/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштшым/S2 а
SFX F7 е ыштшым/S2 е
SFX F7 о ыштшым/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштшым/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштла/S4 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштла/S4 а
SFX F7 е ыштла/S4 е
SFX F7 о ыштла/S4 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштла/S4 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштшыла/S4 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштшыла/S4 а
SFX F7 е ыштшыла/S4 е
SFX F7 о ыштшыла/S4 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштшыла/S4 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштге/S5 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштге/S5 а
SFX F7 е ыштге/S5 е
SFX F7 о ыштге/S5 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштге/S5 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштшыге/S5 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштшыге/S5 а
SFX F7 е ыштшыге/S5 е
SFX F7 о ыштшыге/S5 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштшыге/S5 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштышт/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштышт/S2 а
SFX F7 е ыштышт/S2 е
SFX F7 о ыштышт/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштышт/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 тышт [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ыштыштшӧ [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштыштшӧ а
SFX F7 е ыштыштшӧ е
SFX F7 о ыштыштшӧ о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштыштшӧ ӧ
SFX F7 0 тыштшӧ [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ыштыштшак [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштыштшак а
SFX F7 е ыштыштшак е
SFX F7 о ыштыштшак о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштыштшак ӧ
SFX F7 0 тыштшак [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ыштыштшат [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштыштшат а
SFX F7 е ыштыштшат е
SFX F7 о ыштыштшат о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштыштшат ӧ
SFX F7 0 тыштшат [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ыштыштшыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштыштшыс а
SFX F7 е ыштыштшыс е
SFX F7 о ыштыштшыс о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштыштшыс ӧ
SFX F7 0 тыштшыс [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ышкышт/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышкышт/S2 а
SFX F7 е ышкышт/S2 е
SFX F7 о ышкышт/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ышкышт/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 кышт [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ышкыштшӧ [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышкыштшӧ а
SFX F7 е ышкыштшӧ е
SFX F7 о ышкыштшӧ о
SFX F7 ӧ ышкыштшӧ ӧ
SFX F7 0 кыштшӧ [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ышкыштшак [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышкыштшак а
SFX F7 е ышкыштшак е
SFX F7 о ышкыштшак о
SFX F7 ӧ ышкыштшак ӧ
SFX F7 0 кыштшак [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ышкыштшат [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышкыштшат а
SFX F7 е ышкыштшат е
SFX F7 о ышкыштшат о
SFX F7 ӧ ышкыштшат ӧ
SFX F7 0 кыштшат [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ышкыштшыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ышкыштшыс а
SFX F7 е ышкыштшыс е
SFX F7 о ышкыштшыс о
SFX F7 ӧ ышкыштшыс ӧ
SFX F7 0 кыштшыс [аы]ш
SFX F7 0 ешышт/S2 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ешышт/S2 а
SFX F7 е ешышт/S2 е
SFX F7 о ешышт/S2 о
SFX F7 ӧ ешышт/S2 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ешыштше [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ешыштше а
SFX F7 е ешыштше е
SFX F7 о ешыштше о
SFX F7 ӧ ешыштше ӧ
SFX F7 0 ешыштшак [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ешыштшак а
SFX F7 е ешыштшак е
SFX F7 о ешыштшак о
SFX F7 ӧ ешыштшак ӧ
SFX F7 0 ешыштшат [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ешыштшат а
SFX F7 е ешыштшат е
SFX F7 о ешыштшат о
SFX F7 ӧ ешыштшат ӧ
SFX F7 0 ешыштшыс [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ешыштшыс а
SFX F7 е ешыштшыс е
SFX F7 о ешыштшыс о
SFX F7 ӧ ешыштшыс ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштде/S5 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштде/S5 а
SFX F7 е ыштде/S5 е
SFX F7 о ыштде/S5 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштде/S5 ӧ
SFX F7 0 ыштшыде/S5 [^аеоӧ]
SFX F7 а ыштшыде/S5 а
SFX F7 е ыштшыде/S5 е
SFX F7 о ыштшыде/S5 о
SFX F7 ӧ ыштшыде/S5 ӧ
SFX F7 0 0/O4 .
SFX F7 0 лык .
